src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-skeeqrm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sǩeeʹrm â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Nom: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Gen: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Acc: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Ill: sǩeerma
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Loc: sǩeeʹrmest
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Com: sǩeeʹrmin
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Ess: sǩeeʹrmen
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Par: sǩeeʹrmed
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Abe: [sǩeeʹrmtaa, sǩeeʹrmtää]
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Nom: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Gen: sǩeeʹrmi
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Acc: sǩeeʹrmid
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Ill: sǩeeʹrmid
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Loc: sǩeeʹrmin
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Com: sǩeeʹrmivuiʹm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Abe: [sǩeeʹrmitaa, sǩeeʹrmitää]
